Louisiana, session 2026, HB138.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9097.29(E)(3), (F)(introductory paragraph), (1), and (3), (G), and
(H) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 33:9097.29(I) and (J) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§9097.29. Parkwood Terrace Crime Prevention and Neighborhood Improvement
District
* * *
E. Powers and duties. The district, acting through its board of
commissioners, shall have the following powers and duties:
* * *
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 138 ENROLLED
(3) To receive and expend funds collected pursuant to Subsection F
Subsections F and G of this Section and in accordance with a budget adopted as
provided by Subsection G Subsection H of this Section.
* * *
F. Parcel fee. The governing authority of East Baton Rouge Parish district
may impose and collect a parcel fee within the district subject to and in accordance
with the provisions of this Subsection:.
(1) The amount of the fee shall be as requested by duly adopted resolution
of the board. The fee, however, shall not be less than one hundred dollars per parcel
per year and not more than one hundred fifty dollars per parcel per year for lots
zoned for residential use.
* * *
(3)(a) The fee shall be imposed only after the question of its imposition has
been approved by a majority of the registered voters of the district voting at an
election held for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code. At
least thirty days prior to any election held to approve imposition of a parcel fee, the
board shall mail notification of the upcoming election to each registered voter of the
district and to the owner of each parcel if the owner is not a registered voter of the
district. During the term of the fee, the board may increase the fee one time during
each subsequent calendar year, without election, not to exceed ten percent of the
amount imposed during the previous calendar year; however, the amount of the fee
shall not exceed the maximum amount authorized in this Subsection. No other
election shall be required except as provided by this Paragraph.
(b) The initial election on the question of the imposition of the fee shall be
held at the same time as a regularly scheduled election in the parish of East Baton
Rouge.
(c) The fee shall expire ten years from its initial levy at the time provided in
the proposition authorizing the fee, not to exceed ten years, but may be renewed as
provided in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph. If the fee is renewed, the term of the
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 138 ENROLLED
imposition of the fee shall be as provided in the proposition authorizing such
renewal, not to exceed ten years.
* * *
G. Additional contributions. The district may solicit, accept, and expend
additional voluntary contributions and grants to carry out its purposes.
G. H. Budget. (1) The board of commissioners shall adopt an annual budget
in accordance with the Louisiana Local Government Budget Act, R.S. 39:1301 et
seq.
(2) The district shall be subject to audit by the legislative auditor pursuant
to R.S. 24:513.
H. I. Miscellaneous provisions. (1) It is the purpose and intent of this
Section that the additional law enforcement personnel and services provided by the
district shall be supplemental to and not in lieu of personnel and services provided
in the district by the city of Baker and the city of Baton Rouge and parish of East
Baton Rouge.
(2) If the district ceases to exist, any funds of the district shall be transmitted
to the governing authority of the city of Baton Rouge and parish of East Baton
Rouge Baker and shall be used for law enforcement purposes in the area included
within the district.
J. Indemnification and exculpation. (1) The district shall indemnify its
officers and board members to the fullest extent permitted by R.S. 12:227, as fully
as if the district were a nonprofit corporation governed thereby and as may be
provided in the district's bylaws.
(2) No board member or officer shall be liable to the district or to any
individual who resides, owns property, visits, or otherwise conducts business in the
district for monetary damages for breach of his duties as a board member or officer,
provided that this provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a board
member or officer for any of the following:
(a) Acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional
misconduct or a knowing violation of law.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 138 ENROLLED
(b) Any transaction from which the board member or officer derived an
improper personal benefit.
(3) To the fullest extent permitted by R.S. 9:2792 et seq., including R.S.
9:2792.1 through 2792.9, a person serving the district as a board member or officer
shall not be individually liable for any act or omission arising out of the performance
of his duties.
Section 2.(A) Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, the provisions of
this Act shall not affect the parcel fee levied within the Parkwood Terrace Crime Prevention
and Neighborhood Improvement District on the effective date of this Act. The governing
authority of East Baton Rouge Parish shall continue to levy the fee until such time as it
expires, as provided in the proposition approved by a majority of the district's registered
voters voting on the proposition at an election held on December 10, 2016.
(B) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection A of this Section, the board of
commissioners of the Parkwood Terrace Crime Prevention and Neighborhood Improvement
District may call an election for the purpose of submitting the question of the imposition of
the fee authorized in this Act to the voters prior to the expiration of the fee. If the imposition
of the fee is approved by a majority of the district's registered voters voting on the
proposition at any such election, the governing authority of the district shall then begin to
levy a parcel fee as provided in the proposition.
(C) At no time shall a property owner in the district be subject to an annual parcel
fee, whether paid to the district or to the parish on behalf of the district or both, that exceeds
the rate limits provided in R.S. 33:9097.29(F)(1) as amended by this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 138 ENROLLED
If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall
become effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.